Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2504
Employer not liable for injuries; when.

(1) An employer shall not be liable for injuries to passengers and other persons resulting from the operation or use of a motor vehicle not owned, leased, or contracted for by the employer, in a ride-sharing arrangement.

(2) An employer shall not be liable for injuries to passengers and other persons because he or she provides information, incentives, or otherwise encourages his or her employees to participate in ride-sharing arrangements, except as provided in section 60-2503.

Laws 1981, LB 50, § 4.